Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1087
Benefits; authorized.

(1) A society may provide the following contractual benefits in any form:

(a) Death benefits;

(b) Endowment benefits;

(c) Annuity benefits;

(d) Temporary or permanent disability benefits;

(e) Hospital, medical, or nursing benefits;

(f) Monument or tombstone benefits to the memory of deceased members; and

(g) Such other benefits as authorized for life insurers and which are not inconsistent with sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109.

(2) A society shall specify in its rules persons who may be issued, or covered by, the contractual benefits listed in subsection (1) of this section, consistent with providing benefits to members and their dependents. A society may provide benefits on the lives of children under the minimum age for adult membership upon application of an adult person.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 16.